Alaska statutes. Title 32. Partnership.
Article 8. Conversions and Mergers.

Cross references. —

For a saving clause declaring that the 2013 changes to this article do not affect an action or proceeding begun or right accrued before July 1, 2014, see sec. 32, ch. 60, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 32.06.902.
Conversion of partnership to limited partnership. [Repealed, § 29 ch 60 SLA 2013.]

Sec. 32.06.903.
Conversion of limited partnership to partnership. [Repealed, § 29 ch 60 SLA 2013.]

Sec. 32.06.904.
Effect of conversion; entity unchanged. [Repealed, § 29 ch 60 SLA 2013.]

Sec. 32.06.905.
Merger of partnerships.

Under a plan of merger approved under (c) of this section, a partnership may be merged with one or more partnerships.

The plan of merger must state

the name of each partnership that is a party to the merger;

the name of the surviving entity into which the other partnerships will merge;

the terms and conditions of the merger;

the manner and basis of converting all or part of the interests of each party to the merger into interests or obligations of the surviving entity or into money or other property; and

the street address of the surviving entity’s chief executive office.

The plan of merger must be approved by all of the partners or a number or percentage specified for merger in the partnership agreement.

After a plan of merger is approved and before the merger takes effect, the plan may be amended or abandoned as provided in the plan.

The merger takes effect on the later of

the approval of the plan of merger by all parties to the merger under (c) of this section;

the filing of all documents required by law to be filed as a condition to the effectiveness of the merger; or

an effective date specified in the plan of merger.

A merger in which a partnership and another form of entity are parties is governed by AS 10.55 (Alaska Entity Transactions Act).

History.

(§ 6 ch 115 SLA 2000; am §§ 15 — 18 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, deleted “or limited partnerships” or similar, at the end of (a) and at the end of (b)(1) and (b)(2); deleted (b)(3), which read, “whether the surviving entity is a partnership or a limited partnership and the status of each partner”; in former (c)(1) deleted “in the case of a partnership that is a party to the merger” preceding “by all of the partners”, deleted (c)(2), which pertained to applicable law regarding approval of mergers; added (f); made related changes throughout.

Sec. 32.06.906.
Effect of merger.

When a merger takes effect,

the separate existence of every partnership that is a party to the merger, other than the surviving partnership, ceases;

all property owned by each of the merged partnerships vests in the surviving partnership;

all obligations of every partnership that is a party to the merger become the obligations of the surviving partnership; and

an action or proceeding pending against a partnership that is a party to the merger may be continued as if the merger had not occurred, or the surviving partnership may be substituted as a party to the action or proceeding.

The commissioner is the agent for service of process in an action or proceeding against a surviving foreign partnership to enforce an obligation of a domestic partnership that is a party to a merger. The surviving partnership shall promptly notify the department of the mailing address of its chief executive office and of any change of address. Upon receipt of process, the department shall mail a copy of the process to the surviving foreign partnership.

A partner of the surviving partnership is liable for

all obligations of a party to the merger for which the partner was personally liable before the merger;

all obligations of the surviving partnership incurred before the merger by a party to the merger and not covered by (1) of this subsection, but the obligations under this paragraph may be satisfied only out of property of the surviving partnership; and

except as otherwise provided in AS

32.06.306

, all obligations of the surviving partnership incurred after the merger takes effect.

If the obligations incurred before the merger by a party to the merger are not satisfied out of the property of the surviving partnership, the general partners of the party to the merger immediately before the effective date of the merger shall contribute the amount necessary to satisfy the party’s obligations to the surviving partnership in the manner provided in AS

32.06.807

as if the merged party were dissolved.

As of the date the merger takes effect, a partner of a party to a merger who does not become a partner of the surviving partnership is dissociated from the entity of which that partner was a partner. A surviving partnership is bound under AS

32.06.702

by an act of a general partner dissociated under this subsection, and the partner is liable under AS

32.06.703

for transactions entered into by the surviving partnership after the merger takes effect.

History.

(§ 6 ch 115 SLA 2000; am § 19 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Cross references. —

For the effect of (a)(4) of this section on Rule 25(c), Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, see sec. 9, ch. 115, SLA 2000 in the 2000 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, deleted “or limited partnership” or similar, ten times throughout the section; substituted “partnership” for “entity” or similar, ten times throughout the section; in (c)(3), deleted “but the obligations under this paragraph may be satisfied only out of property of the entity if the partner is a limited partner” following “after the merger takes effect”; in (d) deleted “, in AS 32.11, or in the limited partnership law of the jurisdiction where the party was formed, as the case may be” following “in the manner provided in AS

32.06.807

”; in (e), deleted “entity shall cause the partner’s interest in the entity to be purchased under AS

32.06.701

or another statute specifically applicable to that partner’s interest with respect to a merger. The surviving entity” following “A surviving partnership”.

Sec. 32.06.907.
Statement of merger.

After a merger, the surviving partnership may file a statement that the parties to the merger have merged into the surviving partnership.

A statement of merger must contain

the name of each partnership that is a party to the merger;

the name of the surviving partnership into which the other partnerships are merged; and

the street address of the surviving partnership’s chief executive office and of any office in this state.

Except as otherwise provided in (d) of this section, in AS

32.06.302

, property of the surviving partnership that, before the merger, was held in the name of another party to the merger is property held in the name of the surviving partnership upon filing a statement of merger.

In AS

32.06.302

, real property of the surviving partnership that, before the merger, was held in the name of another party to the merger is property held in the name of the surviving partnership upon recording a certified copy of the statement of merger in the office for recording transfers of the real property.

A filed and, if appropriate, recorded statement of merger, executed and declared to be accurate under AS

32.06.970(c)

, stating the name of a partnership that is a party to the merger in whose name property was held before the merger and the name of the surviving partnership, but not containing all of the other information required by (b) of this section, operates with respect to the partnerships named to the extent provided in (c) and (d) of this section.

History.

(§ 6 ch 115 SLA 2000; am § 20 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, deleted “or limited partnership,” or similar, six times; substituted “partnership “for “entity” or similar six times; deleted (b)(4), which read “whether the surviving entity is a partnership or a limited partnership”.

Sec. 32.06.908.
Nonexclusivity.

AS

32.06.905

—

32.06.907

are not exclusive. Partnerships or limited partnerships may enter into mergers, interest exchanges, conversions, and domestications under AS 10.55 (Alaska Entity Transactions Act) or in any other manner provided by law.

History.

(§ 6 ch 115 SLA 2000; am § 21 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, in the first sentence substituted “AS

32.06.905

—

32.06.907

” for “AS

32.06.902

—

32.06.908

”; in the second sentence substituted “may enter into mergers, interest exchanges, conversions, and domestications under AS 10.55 (Alaska Entity Transactions Act) or in” for “may be converted or merged in ”.

Sec. 32.06.909.
Definitions for AS 32.06.902 — 32.06.908. [Repealed, § 29 ch 60 SLA 2013.]